Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-833
Error proceedings; jurisdiction of court.

In error proceedings to reverse, vacate, or modify a final order by a school board made pursuant to sections 79-824 to 79-842, the school district, school board, or both may be named as defendants in error in the proceedings. The proceedings shall not be defeated and the court shall not be deprived of subject matter jurisdiction because the petitioner named the school board rather than the school district or the school district rather than the school board as the defendant in error.

This section shall apply to all error proceedings pending in the district court or the Supreme Court on June 11, 1991, and to error proceedings commenced after such date.

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 60;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 65;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-12,115.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 463.